test/src/morphology/N-musht_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - mušt: # Noun 68 'eng /est viiger/fin' - full paradigm
     mušt+N+Sg+Nom: mušt
     mušt+N+Sg+Gen: mušt
     mušt+N+Sg+Par: muštõ
     mušt+N+Sg+Dat: muštõn
     mušt+N+Sg+Ins: muštõks
     mušt+N+Sg+Ill: muštõ
     mušt+N+Sg+Ela: muštõst
     mušt+N+Pl+Nom: muštīd
     mušt+N+Pl+Gen: muštīd
     mušt+N+Pl+Par: muštīdi
     mušt+N+Pl+Dat: muštīdõn
     mušt+N+Pl+Ins: muštīdõks
     mušt+N+Pl+Ill: muštīz
     mušt+N+Pl+Ela: muštīst
